Massachusetts, session 194th, S2378.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3A of Chapter 40A is herby amended by adding the following subsection:
(d) For the purposes of this section and any guidelines promulgated thereunder, the
following terms shall have the following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise,
“Bus station” means a bus rapid transit stop serving as a point of embarkation along a bus
rapid transit corridor for a high-capacity bus-based rapid transport system accompanied by a
sheltered platform, terminal or other fixed infrastructure serving as a point of embarkation or any
stop along the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority’s silver line.
“Bus stop,” a point of embarkation along a bus rapid transit corridor not accompanied by
a sheltered platform.
“Commuter rail station” means any MBTA commuter rail station with year-round, rather
than intermittent, seasonal, or event-based, service, including stations under construction but not
of 2

including existing stations at which service will be terminated, or permanently reduced below
regular year-round service.
“Rapid Transit Station” an MBTA subway station or MBTA Silver Line Rapid Bus
Transit Station.
“Rapid transit community” means an MBTA community that has within its borders at
least 100 acres of developable station area associated with one or more subway stations, or
MBTA Silver Line bus rapid transit stations.
“Subway station” means a Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority station with
uninterrupted service running inbound-to or outbound-from either Park Street Station,
Government Center Station, Downtown Crossing Station, or State Street Station as part of the
Red, Blue, Orange, or Green Lines.
“Trolley Station” means an MBTA station providing connecting service to a subway
station but does not provide direct service either inbound-to or outbound-from Park Street
Station, Government Center Station, Downtown Crossing Station, or State Street Station.
of 2